Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5892.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "safe cosmetics act". Sec. 3. For purposes of this act, the words and phrases defined in sections 4 and 5 have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections. These definitions apply to use of the defined terms in this act. Sec. 4. (1) "Asbestos-containing compound" includes talc. (2) "Benzophenone" includes all of the following: (a) 2, 4-dihydroxybenzophenone. (b) Benzophenone-1. (c) Benzophenone-2. (d) Benzophenone-3. (e) Oxybenzone. (f) Resbenzophenone. (3) "Butylated compound" includes both of the following: (a) Butylated hydroxyanisole. (b) Butylated hydroxytoluene. (4) "Chemical" means either of the following: (a) A substance with a distinct molecular composition and the breakdown of products of the substance that form through decomposition, degradation, or metabolism. (b) A group of structurally related substances and the breakdown of products of the substances that form through decomposition, degradation, or metabolism. (5) "Color cosmetics" means a cosmetic product that either enhances or conceals the natural pigment of an individual's skin by applying color. Color cosmetics includes, but is not limited to, eyeshadow, eyeliner, blush, lipstick, and foundation that is tinted color coverage. (6) "Contaminant" means a trace amount of a chemical that is incidental to manufacturing and that does not serve an intended function in the product component, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (a) An unintended by-product of a chemical reaction during the manufacture of the product component. (b) A trace impurity in feedstock. (c) An incompletely reacted chemical mixture. (d) A degradation product. (7) "Cosmetic product" means a consumer good intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled on, sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body, or any part of the human body, for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering appearance, and any part of a component of the consumer good. Cosmetic product does not include any of the following: (a) A soap. (b) A dietary supplement. (c) Except as otherwise provided in section 11, a food or drug that is regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (8) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (9) "Ethanolamine" includes both of the following: (a) Diethanolamine. (b) Triethanolamine. (10) "Formaldehyde-releasing agent" means a chemical that releases formaldehyde. (11) "General cosmetics" means a cosmetic product that is not primarily intended to provide color, including, but not limited to, a product that cleanses, protects, moisturizes, provides fragrance, or enhances appearance without imparting color. Sec. 5. (1) "Heavy metal" includes all of the following: (a) Arsenic. (b) Cadmium. (c) Chromium. (d) Nickel. (e) Selenium. (2) "Intentionally added chemical" means a chemical to which either of the following applies: (a) The chemical has been intentionally added by a manufacturer, packer, or supplier to an ingredient, a raw material, a product, or a packaging and that has a functional or technical effect on the product or packaging. (b) The chemical is an intentional breakdown product of an added chemical described in subdivision (a). (3) "Known carcinogen" includes all of the following: (a) Benzene. (b) Carbon black. (c) Coal tar. (d) Ethylene oxide. (e) Toluene. (f) Naphthalene. (g) Nickel (Metallic). (h) Styrene. (i) Xylene. (4) "Manufacturer" means a person that produces a cosmetic product, the owner of the cosmetic product, or a domestic distributor of a cosmetic product. Manufacturer does not include either of the following: (a) A retailer that sells to consumers a cosmetic product produced by a third party. (b) A grocery wholesaler or grocery retailer that contracts with a third party to produce a cosmetic product on behalf of and under the brand of the grocery wholesaler or grocery retailer. (5) "Ortho-phthalates" means a class of chemicals that are esters of ortho-phthalic acid. (6) "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substance" means a substance in the class of fluorinated organic chemicals that is manmade and has at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom. (7) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (8) "Phenylenediamine" includes all of the following: (a) M-phenylenediamine. (b) O-phenylenediamine. (c) P-phenylenediamine. (9) "Practical quantification limit" means the lowest concentration of a chemical that can be readily measured within specific limits of precision, accuracy, representativeness, completeness, and comparability during routine laboratory operating conditions. (10) "Siloxane" includes all of the following: (a) Cyclopentasiloxane. (b) Cyclosiloxane. (c) Cyclotetrasiloxane. (d) Octamethylcyclotetrasiloxane. Sec. 11. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a manufacturer shall not knowingly manufacturer, sell, offer for sale or use, or distribute for sale or use in this state a cosmetic product that contains any of the following intentionally added chemicals or classes of chemicals above the practical quantification limit: (a) Asbestos and asbestos-containing compounds. (b) Benzophenones. (c) Butylated compounds. (d) Ethanolamines. (e) Formaldehyde and formaldehyde-releasing agents. (f) Heavy metals or heavy metal-containing compounds. (g) Known carcinogens. (h) Nonylphenol. (i) Ortho-phthalates. (j) Parabens. (k) Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (l) Phenylenediamines. (m) Siloxanes. (n) Triclocarban. (o) Triclosan. (2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a manufacturer shall not knowingly manufacturer, sell, offer for sale or use, or distribute for sale or use in this state a cosmetic product that contains lead or lead compounds at 2 parts per million or above for a general cosmetic and 5 parts per million or above for a color cosmetic. (3) This section applies to a cosmetic product even if the product contains a drug ingredient that is regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration. Sec. 13. If the department believes that a manufacturer has violated section 11, the department may request that the manufacturer, not later than 10 days after receiving the request, provide a statement of compliance with section 11, as applicable, on a form prescribed by the department. Sec. 15. (1) Subject to subsection (2), a manufacturer that violates section 11 is subject to a civil fine of not more than either of the following: (a) For a first violation, $5,000.00. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, $10,000.00. (2) A violation of section 11 consists of a single course of conduct for an entire cosmetic product line. (3) A violation of section 11 may be enforced by the prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or by the attorney general.